North Carolina, session 2025, SB496.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Office of State
Budget and Management the sum of six million two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($6,250,000)
in nonrecurring funds for the 2025-2026 fiscal year to provide a directed grant to the North
Carolina Coastal Federation, Inc., to be used as follows:
(1) One million dollars ($1,000,000) for construction of an education and event
center on Bogue Sound in Carteret County. These funds would be used to
match eight million dollars ($8,000,000) in private funds.
(2) Five million dollars ($5,000,000) for the Living Shoreline Protection
Program.
(3) Two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000) for a statewide oyster shell
recycling program.
SECTION 2. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Office of State
Budget and Management the sum of one million dollars ($1,000,000) in recurring funds each
year of the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium to provide a directed grant to the North Carolina Coastal
Federation, Inc., to support a permanent Abandoned and Derelict Vessel Removal Program.
SECTION 3. This act becomes effective July 1, 2025.
*S496-v-1*